Washington statutes.
RCW 43.07.129

Washington state library operations account.

The Washington state library operations account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All moneys received under RCW 36.18.010(11) and 43.07.128 must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may be made only for the following purposes:

(1) Payment of the financing contract entered into by the secretary of state for the Washington state library-archives building;

(2) Capital maintenance of the Washington state library-archives building and the specialized regional facility located in eastern Washington designed to serve the archives, records management, and digital data management needs of local government; and

(3) Program operations that serve the public, relate to the collections and exhibits housed in the Washington state library-archives building, or fulfill the missions of the state archives and state library.

Only the secretary of state or the secretary of state's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. An appropriation is not required for expenditures, but the account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.

[ 2019 c 448 s 7; 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 917; 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 940; 2007 c 523 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2019 c 448: See note following RCW 43.07.405.

Effective date—2012 2nd sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 2.68.020.

Effective dates—2011 1st sp.s. c 50: See note following RCW 15.76.115.

Contingency—2007 c 523: See note following RCW 43.07.128.